Mississippi, session 2026, SB2921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-17-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-17-29.  The Secretary of State shall file with the Clerk of the House and the Secretary of the Senate on the first day of the regular legislative session the complete text of each initiative for which a petition has been certified and filed with him.  A constitutional initiative may be adopted or amended by a majority vote of each house of the Legislature.  If the initiative is adopted, amended or rejected by the Legislature; or if no action is taken within four (4) months of the date that the initiative is filed with the Legislature, the Secretary of State shall place the initiative on the ballot for the next statewide general election.  If the Legislature amends an initiative, the amended version and the original initiative shall be submitted to the electors.  The amended version shall honor the intent and substance of the original initiative.  An initiative or legislative alternative must receive a majority of the votes thereon and not less than forty percent (40%) of the total votes cast at the election at which the measure was submitted to be approved.  If conflicting initiatives or legislative alternatives are approved at the same election, the initiative or legislative alternative receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall prevail. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1 in the year following the year in which the Secretary of State certifies the passage of the constitutional amendment proposed in "Senate Concurrent Resolution No. __," 2026 Regular Session.